Utah statutes.
53B-17-302.   Receipt for dead body -- Records.
(1)  A person delivering a body to the university under Section 53B-17-301
shall receive a receipt for the body.
(2)  The School of Medicine is responsible for records kept on any body
received under this section.
(3)  The records shall include all facts necessary for proper identification
of the body.
